Colorado statutes. TITLE 16 Criminal Proceedings
PART 1 GENERAL PROVISIONS
16-8-118. Temporary removal for treatment and rehabilitation.

The chief officer of the institution in which a defendant has been committed under this article or article 8.5 of this title may authorize treatment and rehabilitation activities involving temporary physical removal of such person from the institution in which the defendant has been placed, if prior to such authorization the following procedures are carried out:

Such chief officer shall give written notice by certified mail, with return receipt requested, to the committing court and the district attorney that on or after thirty-five days from the date of mailing such notice he or she will authorize treatment and rehabilitation activities involving temporary physical removal of the defendant from the institution, unless written objections to such authorization are received by him or her within thirty-five days from the date of mailing such notice.

The clerk of the committing court shall deliver a copy of the notice mentioned in paragraph (a) of this subsection (1) to the attorney of record for the defendant. The district attorney or the attorney of record for the defendant may file objections with the clerk of the committing court to the proposed action of the chief officer of the institution in which such defendant is held. A copy of any such objections shall be delivered by the party making such objections, either by mail or by personal service, to such chief officer prior to the expiration of thirty-five days from the mailing of the notice by the chief officer of the institution.

In the event that objections are filed and served as provided in paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection (1), the committing court shall fix a time for a hearing upon the objections, and no removal of the defendant from the institution in which he is held shall be authorized unless and until approval thereof is given by the committing court following such hearing.

(1.5) The chief officer of the institution is authorized to allow a defendant, without court authorization as set forth in subsection (1) of this section, to leave the physical premises of the treatment or habilitation facility for needed medical treatment at a hospital, clinic, or other health-care facility, so long as the defendant is accompanied by staff from the facility.

A court shall order any defendant who receives treatment and rehabilitation activities involving temporary physical removal of the defendant from the institution to register with the local law enforcement agency of the jurisdiction in which the defendant resides if the court finds that:

The defendant was found not guilty by reason of insanity on a charge of an offense involving unlawful sexual behavior; or

The defendant was found not guilty by reason of insanity on a charge of any other offense, the underlying factual basis of which includes an offense involving unlawful sexual behavior.

A court may order any defendant who receives treatment and rehabilitation activities involving temporary physical removal of the defendant from the institution to register with the local law enforcement agency of the jurisdiction in which the defendant resides if the court finds that the chief officer of the institution in which the defendant has been committed recommends registration based on information obtained from the defendant during the course of treatment that indicates the defendant has committed an offense involving unlawful sexual behavior.

Prior to temporary physical removal from the institution of any defendant who is required to register pursuant to this subsection (2), the department of human services shall obtain from the defendant the address at which the defendant plans to reside and shall notify the local law enforcement agency of the jurisdiction in which the defendant plans to reside and the Colorado bureau of investigation as provided in section 16-8-115 (4)(c).

Any defendant required to register pursuant to this subsection (2) shall register as provided in section 16-8-115 (4). The local law enforcement agency shall transmit any registrations received pursuant to this subsection (2) to the Colorado bureau of investigation within three business days following receipt. The Colorado bureau of investigation shall include any registration information received pursuant to this section in the central registry established pursuant to section 16-22-110, and shall specify that the information applies to a defendant required to register as a condition of temporary physical removal from an institution. The forms completed by defendants required to register pursuant to this subsection (2) shall be confidential and shall not be open to inspection except as otherwise provided in section 16-8-115 (3)(e) for information pertaining to persons granted conditional release and except as provided for release of information to the public pursuant to sections 16-22-110 (6) and 16-22-112.

Any defendant required to register pursuant to this subsection (2), upon completion of a period of not less than twenty years from the date the defendant begins receiving treatment and rehabilitation activities involving temporary physical removal of the defendant from the institution, may petition the district court for an order that discontinues the requirement for such registration and removes the defendant's name from the central registry established pursuant to section 16-22-110. The court may issue such order only if the court makes written findings of fact that the defendant has neither been convicted nor found not guilty by reason of insanity of an offense involving unlawful sexual behavior subsequent to such temporary removal and that the defendant would not pose an undue threat to the community if allowed to live in the community without registration.

Upon the filing of a petition pursuant to this subsection (2)(d), the court shall set a date for a hearing on the petition. The defendant shall notify the local law enforcement agency with which the defendant is required to register and the prosecuting attorney for the jurisdiction in which the local law enforcement agency is located of the filing of the petition and the hearing date. The court shall notify the victim of the filing of the petition and the hearing date. At the hearing, the court shall give opportunity to the victim to provide written or oral testimony. If the court enters an order discontinuing the defendant's duty to register, the defendant shall send a copy of the order to the local law enforcement agency and the Colorado bureau of investigation.

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 232, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-8-118.

L. 73:

p. 501, § 1.

L. 86:

(1)(a), (1)(b), and (1)(c) amended, p. 738, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

(2) added, p. 498, § 2, effective July 1; (2)(c) amended, p. 1191, § 38, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

(2)(d)(I) amended, p. 1990, § 29, effective May 22.

L. 2005:

(2)(a) amended and (2)(a.5) added, p. 996, § 2, effective June 2.

L. 2008:

IP(1) amended and (1.5) added, p. 1859, § 14, effective July 1.

L. 2012:

(1)(a) and (1)(b) amended, (SB 12-175), ch. 208, p. 851, § 79, effective July 1.

L. 2019:

(2)(d)(II) amended, (HB 19-1064), ch. 296, p. 2749, § 2, effective May 28.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2008 act amending the introductory portion to subsection (1) and enacting subsection (1.5), see section 1 of chapter 389, Session Laws of Colorado 2008.

16-8-119. Counsel and physicians for indigent defendants.

In all proceedings under this article, upon motion of the defendant and proof that he is indigent and without funds to employ physicians, psychologists, or attorneys to which he is entitled under this article, the court shall appoint such physicians, psychologists, or attorneys for him at state expense.

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 232, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-8-119.

Cross references:

For representation of indigent persons generally, see § 21-1-103.

16-8-120. Applicable tests for release.

As to any person charged with any crime allegedly committed on or after June 2, 1965, the test for determination of a defendant's sanity for release from commitment, or his eligibility for conditional release, shall be: "That the defendant has no abnormal mental condition which would be likely to cause him to be dangerous either to himself or to others or to the community in the reasonably foreseeable future".

As to any person charged with any crime allegedly committed prior to June 2, 1965, the test for determination of a defendant's sanity for release from commitment, or his eligibility for conditional release, shall be the test provided by law at the time of the alleged crime to determine the sanity or insanity of such defendant.

As to any person charged with any crime allegedly committed on or after July 1, 1983, the test for determination of a defendant's sanity for release from commitment, or his eligibility for conditional release, shall be: "That the defendant has no abnormal mental condition which would be likely to cause him to be dangerous either to himself or others or to the community in the reasonably foreseeable future, and is capable of distinguishing right from wrong and has substantial capacity to conform his conduct to requirements of law".

As to any person charged with any crime allegedly committed on or after July 1, 1983, but before July 1, 1995, resulting in commitment by reason of impaired mental condition, the test for determination of a defendant's mental condition for release from commitment, or a defendant's eligibility for conditional release, shall be: "That the defendant has no abnormal mental condition which would be likely to cause the defendant to be dangerous either to himself or herself or to others or to the community in the reasonably foreseeable future".

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 232, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-8-120.

L. 83:

(3) added, p. 680, § 3, effective July 1; (4) added, p. 676, § 9, effective July 1.

L. 95:

(4) amended, p. 78, § 13, effective July 1.

16-8-121. Escape - return to institution.

If any defendant, confined in an institution for the care and treatment of persons with behavioral or mental health disorders or intellectual and developmental disabilities under the supervision of the executive director of the department of human services, escapes from such institution, it is the duty of the chief officer to apply forthwith to the district court for the county in which the hospital or institution is located for a warrant of arrest directed to the sheriff of the county, commanding him or her forthwith to take all necessary legal action to effect the arrest of the defendant and to return him or her promptly to the institution. The fact of an escape becomes a part of the official record of a defendant and must be certified to the committing court as part of the record in any proceeding to determine whether the defendant is eligible for release from commitment or eligible for conditional release.

If any defendant committed to the custody of the executive director of the department of human services and placed in an institution under his or her supervision has escaped from an institution for the care and treatment of persons with behavioral, mental health, or substance use disorders in another state, the chief officer is authorized to return the defendant to the institution from which he or she escaped. The chief officer is further authorized to effect the return at the expense of the state of Colorado and under such terms and conditions as the chief officer deems suitable.

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 232, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-8-121.

L. 83:

(1) amended, p. 676, § 10, effective July 1.

L. 87:

Entire section amended, p. 1170, § 8, effective April 22.

L. 94:

(1) and (2) amended, p. 2650, § 122, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

(1) amended, p. 1397, § 42, effective August 7.

L. 2017:

Entire section amended, (SB 17-242), ch. 263, p. 1297, § 119, effective May 25.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 1994 act amending subsections (1) and (2), see section 1 of chapter 345, Session Laws of Colorado 1994. For the legislative declaration in SB 17-242, see section 1 of chapter 263, Session Laws of Colorado 2017.

16-8-122. Commitment and observation.

Upon the termination of the period of observation of a defendant committed under section 16-8-106, the authorities shall present to the court their account, evidenced by a statement thereof based upon the established per diem rate of the place of confinement. If approved by the court, the account shall be paid by the state pursuant to section 13-3-104, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 233, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-8-122.

L. 75:

Entire section amended, p. 210, § 27, effective July 16.